Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 100.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201021-2654
Charging order;
authorized; procedure; effect;
powers of court.

(1) On application
to a court of competent jurisdiction by any judgment creditor of a member
or transferee, the court may charge the transferable interest of the judgment
debtor in the limited liability company with payment of the unsatisfied amount
of the judgment with interest. To the extent of the amounts so charged, the
judgment creditor has only the rights of the transferee to receive any distribution
to which the judgment debtor would otherwise have been entitled with respect
to the interest of the judgment debtor in the limited liability company.

(2) A charging order entered pursuant to this section constitutes
a lien on the judgment debtor's transferable interest in the limited liability
company.

(3) To the
extent necessary to effectuate the collection of distributions pursuant to
a charging order in effect under subsection (1) of this section, the court
may (a) appoint a receiver of the distribution subject to the charging order,
and the receiver shall have the power to make all inquiries the judgment debtor
might have made, and (b) make all other orders necessary to give effect to
the charging order.

(4) Upon a showing that distributions under a charging order will
not pay the judgment debt within a reasonable time, the court may foreclose
the lien and order the sale of the transferable interest. The purchaser at
the foreclosure sale only obtains the transferable interest and does not become
a member of the limited liability company.

(5) At any time before completion of the
foreclosure sale under subsection (4) of this section, the member or transferee
whose transferable interest is subject to a charging order under subsection
(1) of this section may extinguish the charging order by satisfying the judgment
and filing a certified copy of the satisfaction with the court that issued
the charging order.

(6) At any time before completion of the foreclosure sale under
subsection (4) of this section, a limited liability company or one or more
members whose transferable interests are not subject to the charging order
may pay to the judgment creditor the full amount due under the judgment and
thereby succeed to the rights of the judgment creditor, including the charging
order.

(7) This section does not
deprive any member or transferee of the benefit of any exemption laws applicable
to the member's or transferee's interest in the limited liability company.

(8) This section
provides the exclusive remedy by which a person seeking to enforce a judgment
against a member or transferee may, in the capacity of judgment creditor,
satisfy the judgment from the judgment debtor's transferable interest.

Laws 2009, LB35, § 1;

Laws 2010, LB888, § 100.
January 1, 2011January 1, 2013